Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 1. Registration of Securities; Exemptions; Notice Filing of Federal Covered Securities.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Sec. 45.56.100.
Securities registration requirement.

A person may not offer or sell a security in this state unless

the security is a federal covered security;

the security is registered under this chapter; or

the security or transaction is exempt from registration under AS

45.56.110

—

45.56.160

.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.105; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.110.
Exempt securities.

The following securities are exempt from the requirements of AS

45.56.100

,

45.56.170

—

45.56.230

, and

45.56.550

:

a security, including a revenue obligation or a separate security as defined in 17 C.F.R. 230.131 adopted under 15 U.S.C. 77a — 77aa (Securities Act of 1933), issued, insured, or guaranteed by the United States; by a state; by a political subdivision of a state; by a public authority, agency, or instrumentality of one or more states; by a political subdivision of one or more states; or by a person controlled or supervised by and acting as an instrumentality of the United States under authority granted by the United States Congress; or a certificate of deposit for any of the foregoing;

a security issued, insured, or guaranteed by a foreign government with which the United States maintains diplomatic relations, or by any of its political subdivisions, if the security is recognized as a valid obligation by the issuer, insurer, or guarantor;

a security issued by and representing, or that will represent an interest in or a direct obligation of or be guaranteed by,

an international banking institution;

a banking institution organized under the laws of the United States; a member bank of the Federal Reserve System; or a depository institution a substantial portion of the business of which consists or will consist of receiving deposits or share accounts that are insured to the maximum amount authorized by statute by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund, or a successor authorized by federal law or exercising fiduciary powers that are similar to those permitted for national banks under the authority of the United States Comptroller of the Currency under 12 U.S.C. 92a; or

any other depository institution, unless, by a regulation or order, the administrator proceeds under AS

45.56.160

;

a security issued by and representing an interest in, or a debt of, or insured or guaranteed by, an insurance company authorized to do business in this state;

a security issued or guaranteed by a railroad, other common carrier, public utility, or public utility holding company that is

regulated with respect to its rates and charges by the United States or a state;

regulated with respect to the issuance or guarantee of the security by the United States, a state, Canada, or a Canadian province or territory; or

a public utility holding company registered under 42 U.S.C. 16451 — 16481 (Energy Policy Act of 2005) or a subsidiary of the registered holding company within the meaning of that Act;

a federal covered security specified in 15 U.S.C. 77r(b)(1) (Securities Act of 1933) or adopted by rule under that provision or a security listed or approved for listing on another securities market specified by regulation under this chapter; a put or call option contract; a warrant; a subscription right on or with respect to the security; an option or similar derivative security on a security or an index of securities or foreign currencies issued by a clearing agency registered under 15 U.S.C. 78a — 78pp (Securities Exchange Act of 1934) and listed or designated for trading on a national securities exchange, a facility of a national securities exchange, or a facility of a national securities association registered under 15 U.S.C. 78a — 78pp (Securities Exchange Act of 1934) or an offer or sale of the underlying security in connection with the offer, sale, or exercise of an option or other security that was exempt when the option or other security was written or issued; or an option or a derivative security designated by the Securities and Exchange Commission under 15 U.S.C. 78i(b) (Securities Exchange Act of 1934);

a security issued by a person organized and operated exclusively for religious, educational, benevolent, fraternal, charitable, social, athletic, or reformatory purposes, or as a chamber of commerce, and not for pecuniary profit, no part of the net earnings of which inures to the benefit of a private stockholder or other person, or a security of a company that is excluded from the definition of an investment company under 15 U.S.C. 80a-3(c)(10)(B) (Investment Company Act of 1940), except that, with respect to the offer or sale of a note, bond, debenture, or other evidence of indebtedness issued by the person, a regulation may be adopted under this chapter limiting the availability of this exemption by classifying securities, persons, and transactions, imposing different requirements for different classes, specifying, with respect to (B) of this paragraph, the scope of the exemption and the grounds for denial or suspension, and requiring an issuer to

file a notice specifying the material terms of the proposed offer or sale and copies of any proposed sales and advertising literature to be used and provide that the exemption becomes effective if the administrator does not disallow the exemption within the period established by the regulation;

file a request for exemption authorization for which a regulation adopted under this chapter may specify the

scope of the exemption;

requirement of an offering statement;

filing of sales and advertising literature;

filing of consent to service of process complying with AS

45.56.650

; and

grounds for denial or suspension of the exemption; or

register under AS

45.56.180

;

a member’s or owner’s interest in, or a retention certificate or like security given in lieu of a cash patronage dividend issued by, a cooperative organized and operated as a nonprofit membership cooperative under the cooperative laws of a state, but not a member’s or owner’s interest, retention certificate, or like security sold to persons other than bona fide members of the cooperative;

an equipment trust certificate with respect to equipment leased or conditionally sold to a person if any security issued by the person would be exempt under this section or would be a federal covered security under 15 U.S.C. 77r(b)(1) (Securities Act of 1933); and

shares of membership stock in the Alaska Commercial Fishing and Agriculture Bank issued under AS

44.81.010

and other securities issued by that bank to members or in connection with loans to members.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.205; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.120.
Exempt transactions.

The following transactions are exempt from the requirements of AS

45.56.100

,

45.56.170

—

45.56.230

, and

45.56.550

:

an isolated nonissuer transaction, whether effected by or through a broker-dealer, if the seller is not a promoter or controlling person; the administrator may define by regulation or order who is a promoter or a controlling person;

a nonissuer transaction by or through a broker-dealer registered, or exempt from registration under this chapter, and a resale transaction by a sponsor of a unit investment trust registered under 15 U.S.C. 80a-1 — 80a-64 (Investment Company Act of 1940), in a security of a class that has been outstanding in the hands of the public for at least 90 days, if, at the date of the transaction,

the issuer of the security is engaged in business, the issuer is not in the organizational stage or in bankruptcy or receivership, and the issuer is not a blank check, blind pool, or shell company that does not have a specific business plan or purpose or has indicated that its primary business plan is to engage in a merger or combination of the business with or an acquisition of an unidentified person;

the security is sold at a price reasonably related to its current market price;

the security does not constitute the whole or part of an unsold allotment to or a subscription or participation by the broker-dealer as an underwriter of the security or a redistribution;

a nationally recognized securities manual or its electronic equivalent designated by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter or a record filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that is publicly available contains

a description of the business and operations of the issuer;

the names of the issuer’s executive officers and the names of the issuer’s directors, if any;

an audited balance sheet of the issuer as of a date within 18 months before the date of the transaction or, in the case of a reorganization or merger when the parties to the reorganization or merger each had an audited balance sheet, a pro forma balance sheet for the combined organization; and

an audited income statement for each of the issuer’s two immediately previous fiscal years or for the period of existence of the issuer, whichever is shorter, or, in the case of a reorganization or merger when each party to the reorganization or merger had audited income statements, a pro forma income statement; and

any one of the following requirements is met:

the issuer of the security has a class of equity securities listed on a national securities exchange registered under 15 U.S.C. 78f (Securities Exchange Act of 1934) or designated for trading on the National Association of Securities Dealers Automated Quotation System;

the issuer of the security is a unit investment trust registered under 15 U.S.C. 80a-1 — 80a-64 (Investment Company Act of 1940);

the issuer of the security, including its predecessors, has been engaged in continuous business for at least three years; or

the issuer of the security has total assets of at least $2,000,000 based on an audited balance sheet as of a date within 18 months before the date of the transaction or, in the case of a reorganization or merger when the parties to the reorganization or merger each had an audited balance sheet, a pro forma balance sheet for the combined organization;

a nonissuer transaction by or through a broker-dealer registered or exempt from registration under this chapter in a security of a foreign issuer that is a margin security defined in regulations or rules adopted by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System;

a nonissuer transaction by or through a broker-dealer registered or exempt from registration under this chapter in an outstanding security if the guarantor of the security files reports with the Securities and Exchange Commission under the reporting requirements of 15 U.S.C. 78m or 15 U.S.C. 78o (Securities Exchange Act of 1934);

a nonissuer transaction by or through a broker-dealer registered or exempt from registration under this chapter in a security that

is rated at the time of the transaction by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization as identified by regulations of the administrator in one of its four highest rating categories; or

has a fixed maturity or a fixed interest or dividend, if

a default has not occurred during the current fiscal year or within the three previous fiscal years or, if the issuer has been in business less than three fiscal years, during the existence of the issuer and any predecessor in the payment of principal, interest, or dividends on the security; and

the issuer is engaged in business, is not in the organizational stage or in bankruptcy or receivership, and is not and has not, within the previous 12 months, been a blank check, blind pool, or shell company that does not have a specific business plan or purpose or has indicated that its primary business plan is to engage in a merger or combination of the business with, or an acquisition of, an unidentified person;

a nonissuer transaction by or through a broker-dealer registered or exempt from registration under this chapter effecting an unsolicited order or offer to purchase;

a nonissuer transaction executed by a bona fide pledgee without the purpose of evading this chapter;

a nonissuer transaction by a federal covered investment adviser with investments under management in excess of $100,000,000 acting in the exercise of discretionary authority in a signed record for the account of others;

a transaction in a security, whether or not the security or transaction is otherwise exempt, in exchange for one or more bona fide outstanding securities, claims, or property interests, or partly in exchange for one or more bona fide outstanding securities, claims, or property interests and partly for cash if the terms and conditions of the issuance and exchange or the delivery and exchange and the fairness of the terms and conditions have been approved by the administrator after a hearing;

a transaction between the issuer or other person on whose behalf the offering is made and an underwriter, or among underwriters;

a transaction in a bond or other evidence of indebtedness secured by a real or chattel mortgage or deed of trust or by an agreement for the sale of real estate or chattels, if

the entire mortgage, deed of trust, or agreement, together with all the bonds or other evidence of indebtedness, secured under those documents, is offered and sold as a unit;

a general solicitation or general advertisement of the transaction is not made; and

a commission or other remuneration is not paid or given, directly or indirectly, to a person not registered under this chapter as a broker-dealer or as an agent;

a transaction by an executor, administrator of an estate, sheriff, marshal, receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, guardian, or conservator;

a sale or offer to sell to

an institutional investor;

a federal covered investment adviser; or

any other person exempted by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter;

a sale or offer to sell securities by or on behalf of an issuer if the transaction is part of a single issue in which

not more than 25 purchasers in this state during any 12 consecutive months, other than a person designated in (13) of this section, regardless of whether the seller or any of the buyers is then present in this state;

a general solicitation or general advertising is not made in connection with the sale of or offer to sell the securities;

a commission or other remuneration is not paid or given, directly or indirectly, to a person other than a broker-dealer registered under this chapter or an agent registered under this chapter for soliciting a prospective purchaser in this state;

the issuer reasonably believes that all the purchasers in this state, other than those designated in (13) of this section, are purchasing for investment and not with a view to distribution;

a legend is placed on the certificate or other document evidencing ownership of the security, and the legend states that the security is not registered under this chapter and cannot be resold without registration under this chapter or exemption from this chapter; and

before a sale, each prospective buyer is furnished with information that is sufficient to make an informed investment decision; the information shall be furnished to the administrator upon request; in this subparagraph, “information that is sufficient to make an informed investment decision” includes a business plan, an income and expense statement, a balance sheet, a statement of risks, and a disclosure of any significant negative factors that may affect the outcome of the investment;

a transaction under an offer to existing security holders of the issuer, including persons that, at the date of the transaction, are holders of convertible securities, options, or warrants, if a commission or other remuneration, other than a standby commission, is not paid or given, directly or indirectly, for soliciting a security holder in this state;

an offer to sell, but not a sale of, a security not exempt from registration under 15 U.S.C. 77a — 77aa (Securities Act of 1933) if

a registration, offering statement, or similar record as required under 15 U.S.C. 77a — 77aa (Securities Act of 1933) has been filed but is not effective, or the offer is made in compliance with 17 C.F.R. 230.165, adopted under 15 U.S.C. 77a — 77aa (Securities Act of 1933); and

a stop order of which the offeror is aware has not been issued against the offeror by the administrator or the Securities and Exchange Commission, and an audit, inspection, or proceeding that is public and that may culminate in a stop order is not known by the offeror to be pending;

an offer to sell, but not a sale of, a security exempt from registration under 15 U.S.C. 77a — 77aa (Securities Act of 1933) if

a registration statement has been filed under this chapter but is not effective;

a solicitation of interest is provided in a record to offerees in compliance with a regulation adopted by the administrator under this chapter; and

a stop order of which the offeror is aware has not been issued by the administrator under this chapter, and an audit, inspection, or proceeding that may culminate in a stop order is not known by the offeror to be pending;

a transaction involving the distribution of the securities of an issuer to the security holders of another person in connection with a merger, consolidation, exchange of securities, sale of assets, or other reorganization to which the issuer, or its parent or subsidiary, and the other person, or its parent or subsidiary, are parties;

a rescission offer, sale, or purchase under AS

45.56.720

;

an offer to sell or sale of a security to a person not a resident of this state and not present in this state if the offer or sale does not constitute a violation of the laws of this state or foreign jurisdiction in which the offeree or purchaser is present and is not part of an unlawful plan or scheme to evade this chapter;

employees’ stock purchase, savings, option, profit-sharing, pension, or similar benefit plan, including any securities, plan interests, and guarantees issued under a compensatory benefit plan or compensation contract, contained in a record, established by the issuer, the issuer’s parent, the issuer’s majority-owned subsidiary, or the majority-owned subsidiary of the issuer’s parent for the participation of their employees, including offers to sell or sales of the securities to

directors; general partners; managers and members, if the issuer is a limited liability company; trustees, if the issuer is a business trust; officers; consultants; and advisors;

family members who acquire the securities from those persons through gifts or domestic relations orders;

former employees, directors, general partners, trustees, officers, consultants, limited liability managers or members, and advisors if those individuals were employed by or providing services to the issuer when the securities were offered; and

insurance agents who are exclusive insurance agents of the issuer or the issuer’s subsidiary or parent or who derive more than 50 percent of their annual income from those organizations;

a transaction involving

a stock dividend or equivalent equity distribution, regardless of whether the corporation or other business organization distributing the dividend or equivalent equity distribution is the issuer, if nothing of value is given by stockholders or other equity holders for the dividend or equivalent equity distribution other than the surrender of a right to a cash or property dividend if each stockholder or other equity holder may elect to take the dividend or equivalent equity distribution in cash, property, or stock;

a transaction incident to a right of conversion or judicially approved reorganization in which a security is issued in exchange for one or more outstanding securities, claims, or property interests, or partly in exchange for one or more outstanding securities, claims, or property interests and partly for cash; or

the solicitation of tenders of securities by an offeror in a tender offer in compliance with 17 C.F.R. 230.162, adopted under 15 U.S.C. 77a — 77aa (Securities Act of 1933);

a nonissuer transaction in an outstanding security by or through a broker-dealer registered or exempt from registration under this chapter, if the issuer is a reporting issuer in a foreign jurisdiction designated by this paragraph or by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter; the issuer has been subject to continuous reporting requirements in the foreign jurisdiction for not less than 180 days before the transaction; and the security is listed on the foreign jurisdiction’s securities exchange that has been designated by this paragraph or by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter, or is a security of the same issuer that is of senior or substantially equal rank to the listed security or is a warrant or right to purchase or subscribe to any of the foregoing; for purposes of this paragraph, Canada, together with its provinces and territories, is a designated foreign jurisdiction, and TSX, Inc., formerly known as the Toronto Stock Exchange, Inc., is a designated securities exchange; after an administrative hearing in compliance with AS

45.56.690(c)

, the administrator, by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter, may revoke the designation of a securities exchange under this paragraph if the administrator finds that revocation is necessary or appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors;

sales by an issuer to the buyer of an enterprise or a business and the assets and liabilities of the enterprise or business if

the transfer of stock to the buyer is solely incidental to the sale of the enterprise or business and its assets and liabilities;

the seller provides the buyer with full access to the books and records of the enterprise or business; and

a legend is placed on the certificate or other document evidencing ownership of the security, stating that the security is not registered under this chapter and cannot be resold without registration under this chapter or exemption from it;

offers or sales of certificates of interest or participation in oil, gas, or mining rights, titles, or leases, or in payments out of production under the rights, titles, or leases, if the purchasers

are or have been, during the preceding two years, engaged primarily in the business of exploring for, mining, producing, or refining oil, gas, or minerals; or

have been found by the administrator upon written application to be substantially engaged in the business of exploring for, mining, producing, or refining oil, gas, or minerals so as not to require the protection provided by this chapter;

a transaction involving only family members, or involving only family members and the corporations, partnerships, limited liability companies, limited partnerships, limited liability partnerships, associations, joint-stock companies, or trusts that are organized, formed, or created by family members or at the direction of family members; in this paragraph, “family members” means persons who are related, including related by adoption, within the fourth degree of affinity or consanguinity; or

a transaction relating to a security that is not part of an initial issue of stock covered by AS

45.55.138

, but that is issued by a corporation organized under Alaska law under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act), if the corporation qualifies for exempt status under 43 U.S.C. 1625(a).

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.210

; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.130.
Small intrastate securities offerings.

An offer or sale of securities conducted solely in this state to a person who has established residency in this state, by an issuer in a transaction that meets the requirements of this section, is exempt from the requirements of

45.56.100

,

45.56.170

—

45.56.230

, and

45.56.550

and is subject to the following limitations:

the issuer of the security shall be a for-profit corporation, another for-profit entity, or a business cooperative, have its principal place of business in this state, and be licensed by the department;

the transaction must meet the requirements of the federal exemption for intrastate offerings in 15 U.S.C. 77c(a)(11) (Securities Act of 1933) and 17 C.F.R. 230.147; the securities must be offered to and sold only to persons who have established residency in this state at the time of purchase; before any offer or sale under this exemption, the seller shall obtain documentary evidence from each prospective purchaser that provides the seller with a reasonable basis to believe the investor has established residency in this state;

the sum of all cash and other consideration to be received for all sales of the security in reliance on this exemption may not exceed $1,000,000, less the aggregate amount received for all sales of securities by the issuer within the 12 months before the first offer or sale made in reliance on this exemption;

the issuer may not accept more than $10,000 from any single purchaser unless the purchaser is an accredited investor as defined by 17 C.F.R. 230.501;

the issuer reasonably believes that all purchasers of securities are purchasing for investment and not for sale in connection with a distribution of the security;

a commission or remuneration may not be paid or given, directly or indirectly, for any person’s participation in the offer or sale of securities for the issuer unless the person is registered as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser representative, or investment adviser under AS

45.56.300

— AS

45.56.350

;

the issuer of the security shall deposit in an escrow account in a bank or other depository institution authorized to do business in this state all funds received from investors until the minimum target dollar amount for the security offering is met; the issuer shall file the escrow agreement with the administrator, and the contents of the escrow agreement must include a statement that the proceeds of the sale under this section will not be released from the escrow account until the minimum target dollar amount for the security offering is met; all funds shall be used in accordance with representations made to investors;

not less than 10 days before the use of any general solicitation or within 15 days after the first sale of the security under this exemption, if general solicitation has not been used before the sale, whichever occurs first, the issuer shall provide a notice to the administrator as prescribed in regulations for this section; the notice must specify that the issuer is conducting an offering in reliance on this exemption and must contain the names and addresses of

the issuer;

officers, directors, and any controlling person of the issuer;

all persons who will be involved in the offer or sale of securities on behalf of the issuer; and

the bank or other depository institution in which investor funds will be deposited;

the issuer may not be, either before or as a result of the offering,

an investment company as defined by 15 U.S.C. 80a-1 — 80a-64 (Investment Company Act of 1940), or subject to the reporting requirements of 15 U.S.C. 78m or 78o (Securities Exchange Act of 1934); or

a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser representative, or investment adviser subject to AS

45.56.300

— AS

45.56.350

;

the issuer shall inform all purchasers that the securities have not been registered under AS

45.56.100

,

45.56.170

—

45.56.230

, and

45.56.550

and may not be resold unless the securities are registered or qualify for an exemption from registration under AS

45.56.110

,

45.56.120

, or

45.56.150

; in addition, the issuer shall make the disclosures required by 17 C.F.R. 230.147(f);

the issuer shall require all purchasers to sign the following statement at the time of sale §I acknowledge that I am investing in a high-risk, speculative business venture, that I may lose all of my investment, and that I can afford the loss of my investment”;

this exemption may not be used in conjunction with any other exemption under this chapter, except the exemption to institutional investors under AS 45.56.300 and

45.56.340

and for offers and sales to controlling persons of the issuer; sales to controlling persons may not count toward the limitation in (3) of this subsection;

this exemption may not be construed to remove any person from the anti-fraud provisions under AS

45.56.500

—

45.56.560

, and the exemption may not be construed to provide relief from any other provision of this chapter other than as expressly stated.

The administrator may by order deny or revoke the exemption specified in this section with respect to a specific security if the administrator finds that the sale of the security would work or tend to work a fraud on the purchasers of the security. An order under this subsection may not operate retroactively. A person may not be considered to have violated an order because of any offer or sale effected after the entry of an order under this subsection if the person sustains the burden of proof that the person did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care, could not have known of the order.

A person who makes application to the department for an exemption under this section shall be assessed a filing fee as prescribed in regulations for this section.

In this section, “residency” has the meaning given in AS

01.10.055

.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.220

; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.140.
Disqualifier.

Exemption from registration under AS

45.56.110

—

45.56.160

is not available for a security or transaction if the issuer, or any of its officers, controlling persons, or promoters, is subject to a disqualifier described in the regulations adopted under 15 U.S.C. 78c(a)(39) as of the date of the transaction or offer.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.230

; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.150.
Waiver and modification.

For any security or transaction or any type of security or transaction, the administrator may by order, waive, withdraw, or modify any of the requirements or conditions of AS

45.56.110

—

45.56.160

.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.240; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.160.
Denial, suspension, revocation, condition, or limitation of exemptions.

Except with respect to a federal covered security or a transaction involving a federal covered security, an order under this chapter may deny, suspend application of, condition, limit, or revoke an exemption created under AS

45.56.110

(3)(C), (7), or (8),

45.56.120

, or

45.56.130

, or an exemption or waiver created under AS

45.56.150

with respect to a specific security, transaction, or offer. An order under this subsection may be issued only under the procedures in AS

45.56.230(d)

or

45.56.690

and only prospectively.

A person does not violate AS

45.56.100

,

45.56.170

—

45.56.190

,

45.56.210

,

45.56.230

,

45.56.550

, or

45.56.720

by an offer to sell, offer to purchase, sale, or purchase effected after the entry of an order issued under this section if the person did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care, could not have known, of the order.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.250; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.170.
Securities registration by coordination.

A security for which a registration statement has been filed under 15 U.S.C. 77a — 77aa (Securities Act of 1933) in connection with the same offering may be registered by coordination under this section.

A registration statement and accompanying records under this section must contain or be accompanied by the following records, in addition to the information specified in AS

45.56.190

, and a consent to service of process complying with AS

45.56.650

:

a copy of the latest form of prospectus filed under 15 U.S.C. 77a — 77aa (Securities Act of 1933);

if the administrator requires, a copy of the articles of incorporation and bylaws or their substantial equivalents currently in effect; a copy of any other information or any other records filed by the issuer under 15 U.S.C. 77a — 77aa (Securities Act of 1933) requested by the administrator; a copy of any agreement with or among underwriters; a copy of any indenture or other instrument governing the issuance of the security to be registered; and a specimen, copy, or description of the security that is required by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter; and

an undertaking to forward each amendment to the federal prospectus, other than an amendment that delays the effective date of the registration statement, promptly after it is filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.

A registration statement under this section becomes effective simultaneously with or subsequent to the federal registration statement when all the following conditions are satisfied:

a stop order under (d) of this section or AS

45.56.230

or issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission is not in effect, and a proceeding is not pending against the issuer under AS

45.56.440

; and

the registration statement has been on file for at least 20 days or a shorter period provided by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter.

The registrant shall promptly notify the administrator in a record of the date when the federal registration statement becomes effective and the content of any price amendment and shall promptly file a record containing the price amendment. If the notice is not timely received, the administrator may issue a stop order, without prior notice or hearing, retroactively denying effectiveness to the registration statement or suspending its effectiveness until compliance with this section. The administrator shall promptly notify the registrant of an order by telephone or electronic means and promptly confirm this notice by a record. If the registrant later complies with the notice requirements of this subsection, the stop order is void as of the date of its issuance.

If the federal registration statement becomes effective before each of the conditions in this section is satisfied or is waived by the administrator, the registration statement is automatically effective under this chapter when all the conditions are satisfied or waived. If the registrant notifies the administrator of the date when the federal registration statement is expected to become effective, the administrator shall promptly notify the registrant by telephone or electronic means and promptly confirm this notice by a record, indicating whether all the conditions are satisfied or waived and whether the administrator intends the institution of a proceeding under AS

45.56.230

. The notice by the administrator does not preclude the institution of a proceeding under AS

45.56.230

.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.305; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.